Louisiana, session 2026, HB513.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3701, 3702(3) and (4), and 3703(D), (I), (L), and (N) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:3702(5) through (8) and 3705 are hereby enacted to read
as follows:
CHAPTER 30. COMPENSATION FOR INTERCOLLEGIATE AND
INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS ATHLETES: NAME, IMAGE, AND LIKENESS
§3701. Legislative intent
The legislature finds that intercollegiate and interscholastic athletics provide
intercollegiate athletes with significant educational opportunities. However,
participation in intercollegiate such athletics should not infringe upon an
intercollegiate athlete's ability to earn compensation for the athlete's his name,
image, or likeness. An intercollegiate athlete must have an equal opportunity to
control and profit from the commercial use of the athlete's his name, image, or
likeness, and be protected from unauthorized appropriation and commercial
exploitation of the athlete's his right to publicity, including the athlete's his name,
image, or likeness.
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 513 ENROLLED
§3702. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(3) "High school" means a public or nonpublic secondary school that
provides education for students in grades nine through twelve.
(4) "Intercollegiate athlete" means a student enrolled in a postsecondary
education institution who participates in an athletic program.
(5) "Interscholastic athlete" means a student enrolled in a high school who
participates in interscholastic athletics as provided in Paragraph (7) of this Section.
(6) "Interscholastic athletic program" means an organized program of
interscholastic athletics offered by a high school, including all practices,
competitions, and related activities, that is sponsored or sanctioned by the high
school and governed by the entity that oversees interscholastic athletics for high
schools in Louisiana.
(7) "Interscholastic athletics" means organized athletic competition between
students enrolled in high schools, sponsored or sanctioned by the schools, and
governed by the entity that oversees interscholastic athletics for high schools in
Louisiana.
(4) (8) "Postsecondary education institution" means a Louisiana public
postsecondary education institution or nonpublic postsecondary education institution
that receives or disburses any form of state student financial assistance, including
scholarships and grants.
§3703. Intercollegiate athlete's compensation and rights; responsibilities of
postsecondary education institutions
* * *
D. A postsecondary education institution shall not prevent or unduly restrict
an intercollegiate athlete from obtaining professional representation by an athlete
agent, marketing representative, or an attorney engaged for the purpose of securing
compensation for the use of the athlete's name, image, or likeness, provided that
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 513 ENROLLED
professional representation obtained by an intercollegiate athlete shall be from
persons registered with or licensed for such activity by the state as follows: in
accordance with R.S. 4:422.
(1)(a) Representation provided by an athlete agent shall be by persons
registered with the state in accordance with, and in compliance with, the provisions
of Chapter 7 of Title 4 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. However, the
notification provisions of R.S. 4:424(D)(3) shall not apply to an athlete agent who
contacts an intercollegiate athlete for the sole purpose of representing the athlete in
matters pertaining to the use of the athlete's name, image, or likeness.
(b) An athlete agent or marketing representative representing an
intercollegiate athlete shall comply with the federal Sports Agent Responsibility and
Trust Act, 15 U.S.C. 7801 through 7807, in his relationship with the intercollegiate
athlete.
(2) An attorney representing an intercollegiate athlete shall be duly licensed
to practice law.
* * *
I.(1) An intercollegiate athlete who enters into a contract for compensation
for the use of the athlete's name, image, or likeness with a value of six hundred
dollars or more shall disclose the contract to the postsecondary education institution
in which the athlete is enrolled, in the manner designated by the institution.
(2) The institution shall prescribe the reporting requirements that govern
disclosures made pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection in alignment with the
rules and guidance of the applicable athletic governing commission.
* * *
L. No postsecondary institution's officers, directors, or employees, including
athletics coaching staff, educators, administrators, healthcare professionals,
consultants, other staff, and agents, whether paid, volunteer, or compensated through
third parties, shall be liable for any damages to an intercollegiate athlete's ability to
earn compensation for the use of the athlete's name, image, or likeness resulting from
decisions and actions routinely taken in the course of intercollegiate athletics or other
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 513 ENROLLED
matters relating directly or indirectly to an athlete's eligibility to participate in
intercollegiate athletics or profit from the use of the athlete's name, image, and
likeness, including but not limited to the administration of an institutions's
institution's policies, procedures, codes of conduct, academic standards, health and
safety protocols, and related matters. No postsecondary institution, nonprofit
organization, including its subsidiaries and affiliates, whether nonprofit or otherwise,
formally recognized by a postsecondary institution, and no officer, director,
employee, other staff member, or agent of the institution or organization shall be
liable in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, under any theory of law or in
equity, to a current, former, or prospective intercollegiate athlete based upon the
performance, nonperformance, breach, or termination of an agreement between the
current, former, or prospective intercollegiate athlete and a third party involving the
payment of compensation for name, image, or likeness. However, nothing in this
Subsection shall protect the postsecondary institution or its employees from acts of
gross negligence or wanton, willful, malicious, or intentional misconduct.
* * *
N.(1) Each postsecondary education management board shall adopt policies
to implement the provisions of this Chapter. Such policies shall require each
postsecondary education institution under its jurisdiction to adopt and maintain
institutional policies governing name, image, and likeness activities of intercollegiate
athletes.
(2) No postsecondary education institution shall implement the provisions
of this Chapter until such time as the appropriate management board adopts the
required policies. Each management board has discretion as to when it adopts
policies to implement the provisions of this Chapter. The policies adopted by each
management board and postsecondary education institution shall, at a minimum,
address the following:
(a) Intercollegiate athlete compensation, including permissible compensation
for the use of an intercollegiate athlete's name, image, or likeness and any required
disclosure of compensation agreements, consistent with this Chapter.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 513 ENROLLED
(b) Postsecondary education institutional involvement, including the
permissible scope of institutional support, facilitation, oversight and compliance
activities related to name, image, and likeness endeavors, consistent with applicable
law and governing athletic association rules.
(c) Use of institutional marks and facilities, including the conditions under
which an intercollegiate athlete or third party may use institutional names,
trademarks, logos, uniforms, facilities, copyrights, colors, or other indicia in
connection with name, image, and likeness activities, and any required approvals or
licensing protocols.
(d) Professional representation, including requirements that athlete agents,
marketing representatives, and attorneys representing intercollegiate athletes in
matters related to name, image, and likeness be properly registered or licensed in
accordance with applicable state and federal law.
(e) Educational workshops and resources available to students, including
financial literacy training, life skills education, and resources related to financial
responsibility, business formation, and marketing to support intercollegiate athletes'
participation in name, image, and likeness activities.
(f) Policy administration and enforcement, which may include procedures
for monitoring compliance, reviewing disclosures, identifying conflicts, and
addressing violations of institutional name, image, and likeness policies.
(g) Designation of a compliance point of contact, including identification of
an office or individual responsible for administering institutional name, image, and
likeness policies and responding to compliance-related inquiries.
(3) Any policy an entity enacts pursuant to this Subsection shall be
consistent with the provisions of this Chapter and shall not unduly restrict an
intercollegiate athlete's ability to earn compensation for the use of his name, image,
or likeness.
* * *
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 513 ENROLLED
§3705. Interscholastic athlete's compensation and rights; responsibilities of high
schools
A. An interscholastic athlete may earn compensation for the use of his name,
image, and likeness, subject to compliance with the provisions of this Section.
B. Any agreement for compensation for the use of an interscholastic athlete's
name, image, or likeness entered into by an interscholastic athlete under eighteen
years of age shall be valid only if executed with the written consent of his parent or
legal guardian.
C. No high school or agent thereof, athletic association, athletic conference,
or other organization with authority over interscholastic athletics shall:
(1) Prohibit or prevent an interscholastic athlete from earning compensation
for the use of his name, image, or likeness, except as otherwise permitted by this
Section.
(2) Prohibit or prevent an interscholastic athlete from obtaining professional
representation by an athlete agent or legal representation by an attorney in
connection with name, image, or likeness matters.
(3) Declare an interscholastic athlete ineligible for interscholastic athletic
competition solely because he earns compensation for the use of his name, image,
or likeness or obtains professional or legal representation related thereto.
D. No athletic association, athletic conference, or other organization with
authority over interscholastic athletics shall prohibit or prevent a high school from
becoming a member of, or participating in, interscholastic athletics sponsored by
such organization as a consequence of an interscholastic athlete earning
compensation for the use of his name, image, or likeness or obtaining representation
by an athlete agent or attorney.
E.(1) Permissible name, image, and likeness activities include but are not
limited to commercial endorsements, promotional activities, social media presence,
and product or service advertisements.
(2) No interscholastic athlete shall earn compensation for the use of his
name, image, or likeness in connection with any of the following:
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 513 ENROLLED
(a) Adult entertainment.
(b) Alcohol or alcoholic beverages.
(c) Cannabis, cannabinoids, cannabidiol, or other derivatives, excluding
hemp or hemp products.
(d) Gaming, gambling, or wagering, including but not limited to sports
wagering.
(e) Controlled dangerous substances, as defined in R.S. 40:961 et seq.
(f) Drug paraphernalia, as defined in R.S. 40:1021.
(g) Performance-enhancing drugs or substances, including steroids or human
growth hormone.
(h) Tobacco, tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, nicotine vapor
products, or similar devices.
(i) Weapons, including firearms and ammunition.
F.(1) A high school may prohibit an interscholastic athlete from earning
compensation for the use of his name, image, or likeness while he is engaged in
academic activities, official team activities, or interscholastic athletic program
activities, including but not limited to class, tutoring, competition, practice, travel,
academic services, community service, promotional activities, and other activities
related to the interscholastic athletic program.
(2) A high school may prohibit an interscholastic athlete from earning such
compensation if the proposed use materially conflicts with an existing high school
agreement related to interscholastic athletics.
(3) No interscholastic athlete shall use a high school's facilities, apparel,
equipment, uniforms, or intellectual property, including logos, indicia, registered or
unregistered trademarks, or copyrighted materials, for any opportunity to earn
compensation for the use of his name, image, or likeness unless otherwise permitted
by the high school.
G. Prior to executing an agreement for the use of his name, image, or
likeness, an interscholastic athlete shall disclose the proposed agreement to the high
school at which the interscholastic athlete is enrolled in a manner prescribed by the
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 513 ENROLLED
high school. If the proposed agreement conflicts with an existing high school
agreement, the high school shall disclose the relevant terms of the conflicting
agreement to the interscholastic athlete.
H. Except as otherwise permitted by this Section, no high school shall enter
into, renew, or modify any agreement that prohibits an interscholastic athlete from
earning compensation for the use of his name, image, or likeness while he is engaged
in nonacademic, unofficial team, or non-interscholastic athletic program activities.
I. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to alter the employment status
of an interscholastic athlete or to classify an interscholastic athlete as an employee
of a high school solely because he engages in name, image, or likeness activities.
J. Any interscholastic athlete aggrieved by a violation of this Section may
bring an action for injunctive relief.
K. The authority that governs interscholastic athletics in this state shall
provide educational materials to interscholastic athletes, parents, legal guardians, and
high schools regarding the rights and responsibilities of interscholastic athletes under
this Section, including guidance on contracts, prohibited activities, and available
professional or legal representation.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.